Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 4. Child Care Facility Revolving Loan Fund.

Administrative Code. —

For child care facility loans, see 3 AAC 82.

Sec. 44.33.240.
Child care facility revolving loan fund.

There is in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development the child care facility revolving loan fund to carry out the purposes of AS

44.33.240

—

44.33.275

. Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this section, the fund may not be used for any other purpose.

The department may use money in the fund for costs of administering AS

44.33.240

—

44.33.275

.

On June 30 of each fiscal year the unexpended and unobligated cash balance of the fund that is attributable to loans owned by the fund lapses into the general fund.

History.

(§ 9 ch 253 SLA 1976; am §§ 55, 56 ch 36 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in (a) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 44.33.242.
Special account established.

There is established as a special account within the child care facility revolving loan fund the foreclosure expense account. This account is established as a reserve from fund equity.

The commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development may expend money credited to the foreclosure expense account when necessary to protect the state’s security interest in collateral on loans made under AS

44.33.245

or to defray expenses incurred during foreclosure proceedings after a default by an obligor.

History.

(§ 18 ch 79 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (b) of this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in (b) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 44.33.245.
Powers and duties of the department in administering the fund.

The department may

make loans for the construction, renovation, and equipping of child care facilities, including private nonprofit child care facilities;

adopt regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of AS

44.33.240

—

44.33.275

, including regulations to establish reasonable fees for services provided and charges for collecting the fee; and

collect the fees and charges established under this subsection.

The department shall

develop eligibility standards for loans to child care facilities;

adopt guidelines for the determination of loan terms.

History.

(§ 9 ch 253 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 112 SLA 1981; am § 57 ch 36 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For repossessed property, see 3 AAC 77.

For child care facility loans, see 3 AAC 82.

Sec. 44.33.250.
Conditions of loans. [Repealed, § 9 ch 112 SLA 1981.]

Sec. 44.33.255.
Loan terms.

A loan to a child care facility under AS

44.33.240

—

44.33.275

may not exceed $50,000.

The rate of interest charged shall be seven percent a year on the unpaid balance of the loan.

The duration for repayment of a loan may not exceed 20 years.

All principal and interest payments, and any money chargeable to principal or interest that is collected through liquidation by foreclosure or other process on loans made under AS

44.33.240

—

44.33.275

, shall be paid into the child care facility revolving loan fund.

If a child care facility ceases operation, any loan to the facility from the fund is due on the date the facility ceases operation.

History.

(§ 9 ch 253 SLA 1976; am § 3 ch 153 SLA 1978; am § 18 ch 72 SLA 1979; am § 2 ch 112 SLA 1981; am § 34 ch 113 SLA 1982; am § 58 ch 36 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For child care facility loans, see 3 AAC 82.

Sec. 44.33.260.
Eligibility for loans.

A child care facility is eligible for a loan under AS

44.33.240

—

44.33.275

if

the applicant submits to the department a plan for the use of the loan funds that is approved by the commissioner;

[Repealed, § 9 ch 112 SLA 1981.]

[Repealed, § 7 ch 153 SLA 1978.]

[Repealed, § 7 ch 153 SLA 1978.]

the applicant meets additional eligibility standards established by the department under AS

44.33.245(b)(1)

.

History.

(§ 9 ch 253 SLA 1976; am §§ 4, 7 ch 153 SLA 1978; am § 9 ch 112 SLA 1981)

Administrative Code. —

For child care facility loans, see 3 AAC 82.

Sec. 44.33.265.
Certificate of need. [Repealed, § 7 ch 153 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 44.33.270.
Sale or transfer of mortgages and notes.

The commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development may sell or transfer at par value or at a premium to a bank or other private purchaser for cash or other consideration the mortgages and notes held by the department as security for loans made under AS

44.33.240

—

44.33.275

.

[Repealed, § 14 ch 122 SLA 1980.]

History.

(§ 9 ch 253 SLA 1976; am § 5 ch 153 SLA 1978; am § 19 ch 72 SLA 1979; am § 14 ch 122 SLA 1980; am § 56 ch 21 SLA 1991)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in (a) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 44.33.272.
Disposal of property acquired by default or foreclosure.

The department shall dispose of property acquired through default or foreclosure of a loan made under AS

44.33.240

—

44.33.275

.
Disposal shall be made in a manner that serves the best interests of the state, and may include the amortization of payments over a period of years.

History.

(§ 19 ch 79 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For repossessed property, see 3 AAC 77.

Sec. 44.33.275.
Definitions.

In AS

44.33.240

—

44.33.275

,

“child care facility” means an establishment the principal purpose of which is to provide care for children not related by blood, marriage, or legal adoption, including but not limited to day care centers, family day care homes, and schools for preschool age children;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

History.

(§ 9 ch 253 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in this section, Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.